Utah statutes.
15-4-2.   Discharge of co-obligors by judgment.

A judgment against one or more of several obligors, or against one or more of joint or of joint and several obligors, may not discharge a co-obligor who was not a party to the proceeding wherein the judgment was rendered.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

